Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 5. Hearings.

Administrative Code. —

For disputes; hearings and appeals, see 2 AAC 07, art. 10.

Sec. 39.25.170.
Hearings and appeals upon dismissal, demotion, or suspension.

An employee in the classified service who is dismissed, demoted, or suspended for more than 30 working days in a 12-month period shall be notified in writing by the employer of the action and the reason for it and may be heard publicly by the personnel board and may be represented by counsel at the hearing. In order to be heard, the complainant shall request a hearing within 15 days of dismissal, demotion, or suspension.

If the board finds that the action complained of was taken for a political, racial, or religious reason, or in violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter, the officer or employee shall be reinstated to the position without loss of pay or leave benefit for the period of dismissal, demotion, or suspension. In all other cases, the board shall report its findings and recommendations to both parties.

History.

(§ 16 ch 144 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For pay, see 2 AAC 7, art. 8.

For disputes: hearings and appeals, see 2 AAC 7, art. 10.

Sec. 39.25.175.
Subpoena authority.

A subpoena shall be issued at the request of a party to a proceeding begun under AS

39.25.170

.

History.

(§ 17 ch 112 SLA 1982)

Sec. 39.25.176.
Effect of failure to respond or obey.

If a person refuses to respond to a subpoena issued under AS

39.25.175

, or refuses to testify at a hearing authorized by AS

39.25.170

, the personnel board may apply to the superior court for an order requiring the person to respond to the subpoena or to testify.

Failure to obey the order of the superior court requiring response to a subpoena or testimony at a hearing may be punished as contempt of court.

History.

(§ 17 ch 112 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as subsections (b) and (c) of AS

39.25.175

. Renumbered in 1982.